Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.080

Commission—Appointment—County.

The members of a commission shall be appointed by the chair of the board with the approval of a majority of the board: PROVIDED, That each member of the board shall submit to the chair a list of nominees residing in his or her commissioner district, and the chair shall make his or her appointments from such lists so that as nearly as mathematically possible, each commissioner district shall be equally represented on the commission.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4107; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.080. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 8.]